Washington statutes.
RCW 16.36.025

Recovery of costs.

(1) The director may collect moneys to recover the reasonable costs of purchasing, printing, and distributing official individual identification devices or methods, regulatory forms, and other supplies.

(2) In addition to the costs identified in subsection (1) of this section, the director may also collect moneys to recover the reasonable costs associated with the data entry and processing related to animal health documents that facilitate disease control and traceability.

(3) All funds received under this section must be deposited in the animal disease traceability account in the agricultural local fund created in RCW 43.23.230 to cover the costs associated with this chapter.

[ 2013 c 45 s 1; 2011 c 204 s 1; 1998 c 8 s 19.]